Wisconsin, session 2025, AB969.
do enact as follows:AB969,11Section 1. 255.056 (1) (bd) of the statutes is created to read:AB969,3,22255.056 (1) (bd) “Donor” means any person authorized under state or federal 3law to possess a drug, including an individual member of the public; wholesaler or 4distributor; 3rd-party logistics provider; pharmacy; dispenser; clinic; surgical or 5health center; detention or rehabilitation center; jail; prison; laboratory; medical or 6pharmacy school; prescriber or other health care professional; long-term care 7facility or health care facility; government agency; drug manufacturer; repackager; 8relabeler; outsourcing facility; hospital operated by the federal department of 9veterans affairs; or person authorized to import a drug under section 801 or 804 of 1the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 USC 381 to 384, or a similar provision 2of federal law. AB969,23Section 2. 255.056 (1) (bg) of the statutes is amended to read:AB969,3,74255.056 (1) (bg) “Drug” has the meaning given in s. 450.01 (10) and includes 5a nonprescription drug product, as defined in s. 450.01 (13m), a prescription drug, 6or a federal food and drug administration-approved drug that is labeled for 7investigational use.AB969,38Section 3. 255.056 (1) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB969,3,149255.056 (1) (bm) “Eligible patient” means an individual who is indigent, 10uninsured, underinsured, or enrolled in a public health benefits program. “Eligible 11patient” includes a patient who is not indigent, uninsured, underinsured, or 12enrolled in a public health benefits program if a need for a donated drug is not 13identified among patients who are indigent, uninsured, underinsured, or enrolled 14in a public health benefits program. AB969,415Section 4. 255.056 (1) (br) of the statutes is created to read:AB969,3,2016255.056 (1) (br) “Health care professional” means a person who is licensed to 17practice as a physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, advanced 18practice registered nurse, as defined in s. 154.01 (1g), optometrist, pharmacist, 19pharmacy technician, or any other person who is authorized to dispense or 20administer drugs.AB969,521Section 5. 255.056 (1) (br) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act 22.... (this act), is amended to read:AB969,4,323255.056 (1) (br) “Health care professional” means a person who is licensed to 24practice as a physician, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, advanced 1practice registered nurse, as defined in s. 154.01 (1g), licensed under s. 441.09, 2optometrist, pharmacist, pharmacy technician, or any other person who is 3authorized to dispense or administer drugs.AB969,64Section 6. 255.056 (1) (d) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB969,4,65255.056 (1) (d) “Pharmacist” means a person licensed by the board under s. 6450.03 or 450.05 or licensed similarly in the state in which the person is located. AB969,77Section 7. 255.056 (1) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB969,4,98255.056 (1) (e) “Pharmacy” means a pharmacy that is licensed under s. 450.06 9or licensed or permitted similarly in the state in which the pharmacy is located.AB969,810Section 8. 255.056 (1) (f) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:AB969,4,1111255.056 (1) (f) “Practitioner” means any of the following:AB969,4,12121. A person licensed in this state to prescribe and administer drugs.AB969,4,14132. A person licensed in another state and authorized to prescribe and 14administer drugs in this state.AB969,4,16153. A person licensed to prescribe and administer drugs in the state in which 16they are located.AB969,917Section 9. 255.056 (1) (gc) and (gm) of the statutes are created to read:AB969,4,2118255.056 (1) (gc) “Recipient” means a person that is licensed or permitted to 19possess a drug in the state in which the person is located, including a wholesaler or 20distributor, reverse distributor, repackager, hospital, pharmacy, medical facility, 21clinic, or prescriber office.AB969,4,2322(gm) “Returns processor” has the meaning given in 21 USC 360eee (18) and 23includes a reverse distributor.AB969,1024Section 10. 255.056 (1) (m) of the statutes is created to read:AB969,5,41255.056 (1) (m) “Tamper-evident packaging” means a packaging system the 2contents of which cannot be accessed without obvious destruction of the packaging 3system, including unit-dose, multiple-dose, immediate, secondary, and tertiary 4packaging.AB969,115Section 11. 255.056 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB969,5,136255.056 (2) The department shall establish and maintain a drug repository 7program, under which any person a donor may donate a drug or supplies, other 8than a drug specified under sub. (2m), and a recipient may receive a donated drug 9or supply for use by an individual who meets eligibility criteria specified by rule by 10the department. Donation may be made on the premises of a medical facility or 11pharmacy that elects to participate in the program and meets requirements 12specified by rule by the department. The medical facility or pharmacy eligible 13patient.AB969,5,1614(2g) (a) A recipient may charge an individual eligible patient who receives a 15drug or supplies under this subsection sub. (2) a handling fee that may not exceed 16the amount specified by rule by the department. A medical facility or pharmacy.AB969,5,1817(2h) A recipient that receives a donated drug or supplies under this 18subsection sub. (2) may distribute do any of the following:AB969,5,2119(a) Distribute the drug or supplies to another eligible medical facility or 20pharmacy recipient for use under the program under this section or to an entity 21participating in a drug donation program operated by another state.AB969,1222Section 12. 255.056 (2g) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB969,6,523255.056 (2g) (b) If the recipient is a for-profit entity, the handling fee under 24par. (a) may not exceed the recipient’s cost of providing the drug or supplies, 1including the current and anticipated costs of educating eligible patients or donors, 2providing technical support to participating donors, shipping and handling, labor, 3storage, licensing, utilities, advertizing, technology, supplies, and equipment. No 4limitation other than the limitations described under this paragraph may be 5imposed upon the amount of a handling fee under par. (a).AB969,136Section 13. 255.056 (2h) (b) and (c) of the statutes are created to read:AB969,6,87255.056 (2h) (b) Repackage the donated drug or supply as necessary for 8storage, dispensing, administration, or transfers, in accordance with sub. (12).AB969,6,119(c) Replenish with the drug or supplies a drug or supplies of the same drug 10name and strength that was previously dispensed or administered to eligible 11patients.AB969,1412Section 14. 255.056 (2m) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB969,6,1413255.056 (2m) (intro.) None of the following drugs may be donated, accepted 14into inventory, distributed, or dispensed under this section:AB969,1515Section 15. 255.056 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB969,6,1916255.056 (2m) (b) A drug for which the U.S. food and drug administration 17requires that a patient using the drug be enrolled in a registry as provided has a 18risk evaluation and mitigation strategy that prohibits inventory transfers under 21 19USC 355-1 (f) (3) (F).AB969,1620Section 16. 255.056 (3) (intro.), (a) and (b) of the statutes are amended to 21read:AB969,6,2422255.056 (3) (intro.) A drug or supplies may be accepted and dispensed into 23inventory under the program specified in sub. (2) only if all of the following 24requirements are met:AB969,7,41(a) The drug or supplies are in their original, unopened, sealed, and tamper-2evident packaging or,; if the drug or supplies are packaged in single-unit doses, the 3single-unit-dose packaging is unopened; or the drug or supplies have been 4repackaged as part of the program specified under sub. (2).AB969,7,65(b) In the case of a drug, the drug bears an expiration date that is later than 690 days after the date that the drug was donated is not expired.AB969,177Section 17. 255.056 (3) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB969,7,108255.056 (3) (bm) In the case of a drug that requires temperature control other 9than room temperature storage, the drug has a method recognized by the U.S. 10Pharmacopeia to detect improper temperature variations during transit. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab969 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab969 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB969 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB969 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB969: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting